extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
abegosu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
abochar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
absolutismu/SmNmGaYs
absolutu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
acanaladura/SfNfGaYs
acencellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aclamar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acongoxamientu/SmNmGaYs
acoroyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acuriosador/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
adorador/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
afatigar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afaxilostráu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
afogaderu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
afustacador/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
agradable/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
agripina/SfNfGaYs
agüeriu/SmNmGaYs
alandrina/SfNfGaYs
alcafresna/SfNfGaYs
alcanzamientu/SmNmGaYs
alforxa/SfNfGaYs
allargadera/SfNfGaYs
allindios/GaYs
allugamientu/SmNmGaYs
altimora/SfNfGaYs
amansamientu/SmNmGaYs
amargurientu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
ambo/GaYs
amomiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amurallar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
andacia/SfNfGaYs
andiques/GaYs
anguilachu/SmNmGaYs
anteponguer/XxVeVhGa st:anteponer
antesdanueche/GaYs
antropófagu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
apadronar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apartador/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
apaterar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apestar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apoderamientu/SmNmGaYs
aprender/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apurridiella/SfNfGaYs
aquexumase/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
archiveru/SaNaGaYs
argumétanu/SmNmGaYs
ariadura/SfNfGaYs
arracada/SfNfGaYs
arreblagada/SfNfGaYs
arrepentimientu/SmNmGaYs
arrexuntura/SfNfGaYs
arrollar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
artificiu/SmNmGaYs
aserción/SfNfGaYs
asesoría/SfNfGaYs
ásperu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
atafarra/SfNfGaYs
atesteronar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atómicu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
atoyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atún/SmNmGaYs
automovilísticu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
aveníu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
aveyuscar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
axugadura/SfNfGaYs
azufre/SmNmGaYs
babosada/SfNfYs
bañal/SmNmYs
basílica/SfNfYs
bemolizáu/AaMaApAsAqYs
bilréi/SmNmYs
bocadillu/SmNmYs
borronáu/SmNmYs
brutal/AaMaApAsAqYs
cabezaleru/SaNaYs
cádmicu/AaMaApAsAqYs
cai/LlV1vS st:caer
caemos/Ll st:caer
calculosu/AaMaApAsAqYs
cambrianu/AaMaApAsAqYs
carángana/SfNfYs
cascadura/SfNfYs
cayo/LlvM st:cayer
caye/LlvS st:cayer
cayemos/Ll st:cayer
cengarrada/SfNfYs
chinchacarnera/SfNfYs
citador/AaMaApAsAqYs
combinable/AaMaApAsAqYs
contrafechu/AaMaApAsAqYs
cortiyu/SmNmYs
cues/V1Ll st:coser
cuarzosu/AaMaApAsAqYs
datu/SmNmYs
descalificación/SfNfYs
diezmu/SmNmYs
díu/V1V2LlAp st:dir
día/V1V2LlAp st:dir
díos/V1V2LlAp st:dir
díes/V1V2LlAp st:dir
doi/LlV3 st:dar
ectoplasma/SmNmGaYs
Eilao/XyGaYs
embalastráu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
embordelar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emotivu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
empecipiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emponderar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encacháu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
encadanáu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
encarbar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enciclopedismu/SmNmGaYs
encubilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enfardelar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engambedor/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
engraniar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllibrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enrevesgar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ensaladura/SfNfGaYs
ensilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ententanueche/GaYs
éntras/XxV7V8GaYs st:entrar
enunciativu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
enxugar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
equivalencia/SfNfGaYs
esbiríu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
escabarriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escapuchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
eschumiciáu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
escotamientu/SmNmGaYs
escuadratayos/GaYs
esfardar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgatuñu/SmNmGaYs
esmanicáu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
espalanqueráu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
espantapastores/GaYs
espendoláu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
esponer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
estame/SmNmGaYs
estantería/SfNfGaYs
estol/SmNmGaYs
estrincu/SmNmGaYs
Eutiquiu/XyGaYs
Euxeniu/XyGaYs
faterna/SfNfYs
fiscal/AaMaApAsAqYs
fosforescente/AaMaApAsAqYs
gabiete/SmNmYs
gastadura/SfNfYs
gravimetría/SfNfYs
helenísticu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
herba/SfNfGaYs
home/SmNmGaYs
imbecilidá/SfNfGaYs
imperdonable/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
indescribible/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
inseminar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
insulina/SfNfGaYs
inxusticia/SfNfGaYs
llabradíes/ApAqYs
llechu/SmNmYs
llonxe/Ys
malhumoráu/AaMaApAsAqYsSmNm
marmotu/AaMaApAsAqYs
meninxal/AaMaApAsAqYs
miramientu/SmNmYs
mortalidá/SfNfYs
nasalización/SfNfYs
nuevu/AaMaApAsAqYsYsSmNm
ocupación/SfNfGaYs
odie/LlvMvS st:odiar
odia/LlvS st:odiar
odio/LlvM st:odiar
organista/SiNiGaYs
orniamentu/SmNmGaYs
oigo/Ll st:oyer
oiga/Ll st:oyer
oigas/Ll st:oyer
oigan/Ll st:oyer
oyi/Ll st:oyer
paniega/SfNfYs
pasudoble/SmNmYs
penosu/AaMaApAsAqYs
picacuayu/SmNmYs
pizarreru/AaMaApAsAqYsSmNm
porzolán/SmNmYs
propaganda/SfNfYs
quiru/SaNaYs
raigo/LlvM st:raer
rai/LlV1vS st:raer
raemos/Ll st:raer
rayo/LlvM st:rayer
raye/LlvS st:rayer
rayemos/Ll st:rayer
reacción/SfNfYs
reguiletu/AaMaApAsAqYs
respiraderu/SmNmYs
rimos/Ll st:rir
riamos/Ll st:rir
riesti/Ll st:rir
rimos/Ll st:rir
riemos/Ll st:rir
ristis/Ll st:rir
riestis/Ll st:rir
rieron/Ll st:rir
riera/Ll st:rir
riere/Ll st:rir
rieras/Ll st:rir
rieres/Ll st:rir
rierais/Ll st:rir
riereis/Ll st:rir
rieran/Ll st:rir
rieren/Ll st:rir
rodavientu/SmNmYs
salesa/SfNfYs
semadera/SfNfYs
sinceru/AaMaApAsAqYs
sopapu/SmNmYs
tacada/SfNfYs
teflón/SmNmYs
tiranu/SaNaYs
toi/LlV3 st:tar
traigo/LlvM st:traer
trai/LlV1vS st:traer
traemos/Ll st:traer
traicioniegu/AaMaApAsAqYs
trayo/LlvM st:trayer
traye/LlvS st:trayer
trayemos/Ll st:trayer
tris/SmNmYs
unir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
unvia/LlGa st:unviar
unvie/LlGa st:unviar
unvio/LlGa st:unviar
urrianu/AaMaApAsAqGaYs
veo/Ll st:ver
véo/LlXxV3V4 st:ver
ves/LlV7 st:ver
vés/LlXxV8 st:ver
ve/LlV1 st:ver
vé/LlXxV2 st:ver
vemos/Ll st:ver
vémos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
veis/LlV9 st:ver
véis/LlXxV0 st:ver
ven/LlV1 st:ver
vén/LlXxV2 st:ver
vea/Ll st:ver
véa/LlXxV1V2V3V4 st:ver
veas/Ll st:ver
véas/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
veamos/Ll st:ver
veámos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
veáis/LlV9V0 st:ver
vean/Ll st:ver
véan/LlXxV1V2 st:ver
vi/LlV3 st:ver
ví/LlXxV4 st:ver
visti/Ll st:ver
vísti/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
viésti/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
vió/LlXxV2 st:ver
vímos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
viémos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
vístis/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
viéstis/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
viéron/LlXxV1V2 st:ver
viéra/LlXxV1V2V3V4 st:ver
viéras/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
vierais/Ll st:ver
vieran/Ll st:ver
viere/Ll st:ver
vieres/Ll st:ver
viéremos/LlV5V6 st:ver
viéreis/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
viéren/LlXxV1V2 st:ver
vei/LlV9 st:ver
vellu/LlVsLl/XxVs st:ver
véseles/Ll st:ver
verderón/SmNmYs
vulcanización/SfNfYs
xicarada/SfNfYs
zabuyería/SfNfYs
